Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 18

Seeds

Preambles. Acts 1931, No. 73, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the necessity for high grade planting seed for agricultural crops is hereby recognized, the purpose of this act shall be to enable farmers to secure pure bred agricultural seeds true to variety, free from noxious weed seeds and free from plant diseases transmittable through the agency of planting seed and free from insect infestation … .”

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 317, § 8: Mar. 3, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Agriculture and Economic Development and in its place established separate House and Senate Committees; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Agriculture and Economic Development and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

2-18-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the State Plant Board;

“Person” means individuals, partnerships, corporations, associations, or two (2) or more individuals having a joint or common interest; and

“Seed” means any agricultural seeds or plants used to produce a crop.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 73, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 12334; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-315.

2-18-102. Penalty — Revocation of certificate.

Any person shall be guilty of a violation who:

Falsely advertises or proclaims that seed has been certified by the State Plant Board;

Uses any emblem, label, or language for the purpose of misleading a person into believing that seed has been certified by the board when it has not;

Misuses any tag, label, or certificate issued by the board;

Obtains or attempts to obtain certification for seed or plants by making false statements or misrepresentations to the board or to the board's inspectors, deputies, or agents;

Having received a certificate, violates any of the rules of the board made under this chapter; or

Violates any agreement made as a condition for receiving a certificate.

Upon conviction, an offender shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

When the person holds a certificate from the board, the certificate, after a hearing before the Director of the State Plant Board has been given to the person, shall be revoked by the director regardless of whether a prosecution is commenced.

Any person whose certificate is revoked by the director shall be entitled to an appeal to the board.

The board's decision shall be final.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (a)(1); and deleted “or” at the end of (a)(1)(A)-(D).

(1)The State Plant Board is empowered to investigate and certify to varietal purity and fitness for planting of agricultural seed on request of the grower thereof.

It shall specify, in its rules, the standards which seed must meet and the methods by which seed must be handled in order to be certified under the classifications.

Any person applying for certification of seed must, if required by the board, produce satisfactory evidence as to character, qualifications as a seed breeder, and possession of such facilities for the growing and handling of purebred seed as may be deemed necessary by the board.

Where there was no warranty, express or implied, other than the certificate of the State Plant Board, seller was not liable for breach of warranty in the sale of such seed. Smith v. Tatum, 198 Ark. 802, 131 S.W.2d 619 (1939) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1931, No. 73, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 12354; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-320; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 10.

2-18-103. Investigation and certification.

(A)For this purpose, the board shall set up, in its rules, one (1) or more classifications of seed, designating the classifications as “Registered” and “Certified” or by any other one (1) or more names which it may specify; and

History.

Acts 1931, No. 73, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 12350; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-316.

2-18-104. Rules.

The State Plant Board:

Shall promulgate all rules necessary to carry into effect the purpose of this chapter, which is to provide supplies of high-grade seed, true to name and free from disease, for planting purposes;

Shall make rules to protect the interest of breeders who have developed high-quality strains of seed; and

May appoint or may authorize the Director of the State Plant Board to appoint such deputies as shall be necessary to carry into effect the purpose of this chapter.

Cross References. Rules authorized, §2-16-207.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 73, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 12351; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-317.

2-18-105. Fees.

To cover costs of inspection and certification, the State Plant Board shall require reasonable fees of all applicants in advance. These fees shall be deposited into a separate fund and shall be used in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

To cover costs of promotion and advertising of certified seed, the board after a public hearing shall establish by rule promotion and advertising fees which shall be collected in advance. The fees shall be assessed upon the acreage grown for certified agricultural seed production or upon the number of certified tags and labels sold for production of certified seed from the acreage.

Those fees collected for seed promotion and advertising shall be remitted by the board to the Arkansas Seed Dealers' Association and the Arkansas Seed Growers Association, or their successors, which shall establish and administer their own promotion and advertising programs.

Before collecting the fees under this subsection or increasing those fees hereafter, the board shall seek the advice of the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in the first sentence of (b)(1).

Cross References. Deposit of fees in State Treasury, §2-16-104.

Certificates issued under the provisions of this section shall run one (1) crop season only.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 73, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 12352; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-318; Acts 1991, No. 955, § 1; 1997, No. 317, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 13.

2-18-106. Certificates of inspection.

Persons whose seed has met the standards set up by the State Plant Board and who have complied with all the provisions of this chapter and with all the rules of the board made under this chapter shall receive from the board the proper certificate of inspection designating the classification of seed.

Each bag or other container of seed sold under the classification designated by a certificate of the board shall bear an appropriate tag or label securely attached to it.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 73, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 12353; Acts 1985, No. 279, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-319.

2-18-107. Improper use of terms.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use the terms “certified” or “registered” as applied to the quality of seed or plants or to use any other term applying to seed classifications promulgated by the State Plant Board, without first having applied for and received the proper certificate from the board.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished as provided in §2-18-102.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 73, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 12355; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-321.

2-18-108. Intergovernmental cooperation.

In administering this chapter, the State Plant Board is authorized to cooperate to the fullest extent with other agencies of the state and federal government.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 73, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 12356; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-322.

2-18-109. Aflatoxin levels.

The level of aflatoxin in Arkansas-grown grain and seed sold or distributed in this state shall be monitored by the State Plant Board.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1374, § 1.

2-18-110. Testing for aflatoxin.

Methods of sampling and analysis of the grain and seed described in §2-18-109 shall meet the standards prescribed by the United States Grain Inspection, Packers and Stockyards Administration.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1374, § 2.

2-18-111. Rules regarding aflatoxin.

The State Plant Board may establish rules necessary to implement the provisions of §§2-18-109,2-18-110, and this section.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1374, § 3.

2-18-112. Local legislation preemption — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Local legislation” means any ordinance, motion, resolution, amendment, regulation, or rule adopted by a political subdivision of this state; and

“Political subdivision” means a local governmental entity, including without limitation a city, county, township, or municipal corporation and any other body corporate and politic that is responsible for government activities in a geographical area smaller than that of the state.

A political subdivision shall not:

Regulate the registration, packaging, labeling, sale, storage, distribution, cultivation, any other use, or application of seeds; or

Adopt or continue in effect local legislation relating to the registration, packaging, labeling, sale, storage, distribution, cultivation, any other use, or application of seeds.

Local legislation in violation of this section is void and unenforceable.

This section does not prohibit a city of the first class, a city of the second class, or an incorporated town from exercising the legitimate police powers of the city or town over building, planning, and zoning regulations under § 14-56-201 et seq., § 14-56-301 et seq., and § 14-56-401 et seq.

[Reserved.]

Cross References. Pipeline companies transporting ammonia and other substances composing fertilizer or its manufacture, §23-15-105.

A.C.R.C. Notes. “References to “this subchapter” in §§2-19-101 —2-19-210 may not apply to §2-19-211 which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates. Acts 1953, No. 221, § 3: approved Mar. 5, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the distribution of anhydrous ammonia and other fertilizers sold in bulk to the farmers of this state is being seriously hampered and that only the provisions of this act will alleviate this situation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1981, No. 398, § 3: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the soils testing and research programs and facilities of the University of Arkansas have made substantial contributions to the agricultural and livestock industries in this state through information derived through research and testing that has led to improved uses of fertilizers and improved formulation of fertilizers used in crop and plant production; that the existing soils testing facilities and funds available for soils testing and research are not adequate to meet the agricultural and livestock needs of this state, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to enable the State Plant Board to collect sufficient fees from the inspection of fertilizer to provide the funds for the efficient and necessary operation of the plant board and the horticulture and soils testing and research facilities of the University of Arkansas, to provide the funds essential for the operation of existing programs and continued progress in the use of fertilizers in crop and plant production in this state, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to enable the plant board to collect said fees for the purposes set forth in this act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1993, No. 783, § 13: Mar. 29, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly meeting in Regular Session that the provisions of this act are of critical importance to the state's ability to continue the duties, responsibilities, and functions of the State Plant Board. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

ALR.

Products liability for fertilizers, insecticides, pesticides, fungicides, weed killers, or articles used in application thereof. 12 A.L.R.4th 462.

Am. Jur. 3 Am. Jur. 2d, Agri., § 58.

C.J.S. 3 C.J.S., Agri., § 93 et seq.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (a).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a).

Commercial fertilizers which are needed in special cases for special agricultural crop uses shall be permitted to be sold in less than the combined twenty-unit minimum of primary plant food elements.

The special agricultural crop-use fertilizers with less than the twenty-unit minimum shall be permitted for sale only after the fertilizer grade is registered with the board.

In order to register the fertilizer grade, the applicant shall submit a written justification which shall show the need for such special fertilizer grade and shall include the fertilizer materials to be used in the special agricultural crop fertilizer formulation.

The board or its designee shall evaluate the formulation based on criteria established by rules of the board; and

A “specialty fertilizer” is any fertilizer distributed primarily for nonfarm use, such as for home gardens, lawns, shrubs, flowers, golf courses, municipal parks, cemeteries, greenhouses, and nurseries.

“Specialty fertilizer” includes a fertilizer used for research or experimental purposes.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added the (d)(1)(A) and (d)(1)(B) designations; redesignated (d)(2) as (d)(2)(A) and (d)(2)(B); and made stylistic changes.

Where an agent of nonresident seller came into Arkansas and solicited the buyer to buy fertilizer from his or her company and the parties entered into a written contract in Arkansas, subject to the approval of the seller's home office, there was an actual proffer of sale within the state to a particular person in the state that constituted an “offer for sale within the state” of fertilizers within the meaning of former similar law. Empire Carbon Works v. J.C. Barker & Co., 132 Ark. 1, 199 S.W. 929 (1917) (decision under prior law).

It shall be unlawful for any manufacturer, individual, corporation, or company, either by themselves or agents, to sell or offer for sale in this state any fertilizer brand or fertilizer materials that have not been registered with and the registration approved by the State Plant Board or its authorized representative, as required by this subchapter.

The fact that the purchaser waives the inspection and analysis thereof shall be no protection to the party selling or offering for sale fertilizer brands or fertilizer materials.

It shall be unlawful for any manufacturers, jobbers, blenders, and manipulators of commercial fertilizers and of fertilizer materials, whether an individual, corporation, or company, either by themselves or by their agents, to sell or offer for sale in this state any fertilizer brand or fertilizer materials that were manufactured at an unlicensed fertilizer blending or bulk storage facility, as required by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 156, § 1.